Vermont, session 2025-2026, H14.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 194, subchapter 5 is added to read:
Subchapter 5. Use of Animals in Product Testing
§ 3941. PROHIBITED USE OF ANIMALS IN PRODUCT TESTING
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Alternative test method or strategy” means a test method, including
a new or revised method, that:
(A) does not use animals;
(B) provides information of equivalent or better scientific quality and
relevance compared to traditional animal test methods; and
VT LEG #378483 v.7

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.14
2025 Page 2 of 4
(C) includes computational toxicology and bioinformatics, high
throughput screening methods, testing categories of chemical substances,
tiered testing methods, in vitro studies, and microphysiological systems.
(2) “Animal” means any nonhuman vertebrate.
(3) “Biomedical research” means the investigation of the biological
processes and causes of disease or research conducted to increase fundamental
scientific knowledge or to expand the understanding about how processes in
living organisms develop and function. “Biomedical research” does not
include testing done to assess the safety or efficacy of chemicals, ingredients,
drugs, vaccines, product formulations, or products.
(4) “Product testing facility” means an entity, institution, business
partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that tests
chemicals, ingredients, drugs, vaccines, product formulations, or products.
(5) “Traditional animal test method” means a process, procedure, or
experiment using animals to obtain information on the characteristics of a
chemical, ingredient, drug, vaccine, product formulation, or product and that
generates information regarding the ability of the chemical, ingredient, drug,
vaccine, product formulation, or product to produce a specific biological effect
under specified conditions.
(b)(1) A product testing facility operating in the State shall not use a
traditional animal test method if a State or federal agency responsible for
VT LEG #378483 v.7

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.14
2025 Page 3 of 4
regulating the specific product or activity for which the test method is being
used has either approved an alternative test method or strategy or granted a
waiver exempting a product or activity from the required traditional animal test
method.
(2) When there is not an alternative test method or strategy or waiver
available pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, a product testing
facility shall use a traditional animal test method using the fewest animals
possible and taking precautions to reduce animal pain and stress.
(3) Nothing in this section shall:
(A) apply to any animal testing conducted for the purpose of
biomedical research;
(B) prohibit the use of any nonanimal test method or strategy for the
testing of any chemical, ingredient, drug, vaccine, product formulation, or
product, even if not an alternative test method or strategy;
(C) prohibit the use of a traditional animal test method as required by
State or federal law; or
(D) prohibit the use of a traditional animal test method that complies
with a written request from a State or federal agency when the agency has
approved an alternative test method or strategy but also has expressly
concluded that a traditional animal test method is needed to fully assess the
impacts of a product or activity on the health or safety of consumers.
VT LEG #378483 v.7

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.14
2025 Page 4 of 4
(c) On or before February 1 of each year, all product testing facilities
operating in the State shall submit a report to the Office of the Attorney
General regarding any animal testing conducted under this section during the
previous calendar year. Each report shall include the number and species of
animal used for traditional animal test methods, the type and number of
alternative test methods used, the number of waivers used, and the purpose of
any traditional animal test methods, alternative test methods, and waivers. The
Office of the Attorney General shall publish on its website the results of data
collected from submitted reports within 90 days following receipt.
(d)(1) A violation of this section is deemed to be a violation of
9 V.S.A. § 2453.
(2) The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct
civil investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil
actions, and private parties have the same rights and remedies, as provided
under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 1.
Sec. 2 EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #378483 v.7